District of Columbia statutes.
44-110.03

General building exterior.

(a)

An ALR shall ensure that the exterior of its facility, including walkways, yards, porches, chimney, gutters, downspouts, paintable surfaces, and accessory buildings are maintained structurally sound, sanitary, and in good repair.

(b)

An ALR that provides services to residents who use wheelchairs, shall make reasonable accommodations to render the ALR accessible to residents who use wheelchairs through the installation of a chair lift, curbcuts, an exterior ramp, or like accommodations.

History

June 24, 2000, D.C. Law 13-127, § 1003, 47 DCR 2647
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-169, § 27(b), 59 DCR 5567

Effect of Amendments

The 2012 amendment by D.C. Law 19-169, in (b), substituted “residents who use wheelchairs” for “wheelchair-bound residents” following “services to” and substituted “residents who use wheelchairs” for “residents who are wheel-chair bound” following “accessible to.”

Editor's Notes

Section 35 of D.C. Law 19-169 provided that no provision of the act shall impair any right or obligation existing under law.